California statutes. Elections Code
(9) If including the list of Supporters and Opponents in the ballot labels as required by this section would necessitate the printing of an extra ballot card compared to the ballot labels not including them, the type size of the part of all of the ballot labels starting with “Supporters:” may be reduced by the minimal amount needed to stop them from necessitating an extra ballot card, as long as the type size is no smaller than 8-point and as long as the type size is reduced by the
 same amount for all ballot measures.

(b) (1) The proponents of the measure shall provide the list of supporters described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) to the elections official when submitting arguments supporting the measure.

(A) For every supporter listed that is an association, a nonprofit organization, a business, or an individual whose title includes an association, nonprofit organization, or business, the supporters shall include a signed statement by a representative of the association, nonprofit organization, or business, under penalty of perjury, that includes its name and an address and that attests (i) that the association, nonprofit organization, or business supports the measure, (ii) that the association, nonprofit organization, or business
 has been in existence for at least four years, and (iii) that it was not originally created as a committee described in Section 82013 of the Government Code.

(B) For every supporter listed that is an individual, the proponents shall include a signed statement by the individual that includes the individual’s name and address and attests that the individual supports the measure.

(2) The opponents of the measure shall provide the list of opponents described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) to the elections official when submitting the arguments opposing the measure.

(A) For every opponent listed that is an association, a nonprofit organization, a business, or an individual whose title includes an association,
 nonprofit organization, or business, the opponents shall include a signed statement by a representative of the association, nonprofit organization, or business, under penalty of perjury, that includes its name and an address and that attests (i) that the association, nonprofit organization, or business opposes the measure, (ii) that the association, nonprofit organization, or business has been in existence for at least four years, and (iii) that it was not originally created as a committee described in Section 82013 of the Government Code.

(B) For every opponent listed that is an individual, the opponents shall include a signed statement by the individual that includes the individual’s name and address and attests that the opponent opposes the measure.

(3) The elections official that receives the ballot arguments and list of supporters or opponents shall confirm that a submission listing supporters or opponents includes the documentation required by paragraphs (1) and (2) and otherwise meets the requirements of this section. The elections official shall ask the proponents or opponents to resubmit a list if the requirements are not met. The elections official may establish deadlines by when proponents or opponents must resubmit a list.

(c) Within one week
 of receipt, an elections official that is not a county elections official that administers a city, district, or school election and that receives a list of supporters or opponents for inclusion on the ballot label or similar description shall, after confirming compliance with this section as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), forward that list to the county elections official.

(d) At least 30 days before the deadline for submitting arguments for or against county measures, a county board of supervisors may elect not to list supporters and opponents for county, city, district, and school measures on the county ballot and future county ballots.

(1) A county shall not include a list of supporters or opponents for any county, city, district, or school measure if the county does not include a list of supporters or opponents for all measures for which the county receives a list that meets the requirements of this section. If the county elects not to list supporters and opponents for county, city, district, or school measures on the county ballot, the requirements of subdivisions (a) through (c) do not apply.

(2) A district measure or school measure on a county ballot shall not include a list of supporters or opponents if the same district or school measure appears on the ballot of another county that does not include a list of supporters or opponents for the measure, in which case the requirements of subdivisions (a) through (c), inclusive,
 do not apply for the measure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 854, Sec. 5.   (AB 3284)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Mailings [9180. - 9180.]

9180.

Whenever the county elections official is required to mail official matter, as provided in Sections 9119, 9120, 9160, 9162, and 9167, only one copy of each official matter shall be mailed to a postal address where two or more registered voters have the same surname and the same postal address.

This section shall only apply if the board of supervisors adopts this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Public Examinations [9190. - 9190.]

9190.

(a) The county elections official shall make a copy of the materials referred to in Sections 9119, 9120, 9160, 9162, and 9167 available for public examination in the county elections official’s office for a period of 10 calendar days immediately following the deadline for submission of those materials. Any person may obtain a copy of the materials from the county elections official for use outside of the county elections official’s office. The county elections official may charge a fee to any person obtaining a copy of the material. The fee may not exceed the actual cost incurred by the county elections official in providing the copy.

(b) (1) During the 10-calendar-day public examination period provided by this section, any voter of the jurisdiction in which the election is being held, or the county elections official, himself or herself, may seek a writ of mandate or an injunction requiring any or all of the materials to be amended or deleted. The writ of mandate or injunction request shall be filed no later than the end of the 10-calendar-day public examination period.

(2) A peremptory writ of mandate or an injunction shall be issued only upon clear and convincing proof that the material in question is false, misleading, or inconsistent with this chapter, and that issuance of the writ or injunction will not substantially interfere with the printing or distribution of official election materials as provided by law. 

(3) The county elections official shall be named as respondent and the person or official who authored the material in question shall be named as real parties in interest. In the case of the county elections official bringing the mandamus or injunctive action, the board of supervisors of the county shall be named as the respondent and the person or official who authored the material in question shall be named as the real party in interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 228, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Municipal Elections [9200. - 9295.]



  ARTICLE 1. Initiative [9200. - 9226.]

9200.

Ordinances may be enacted by and for any incorporated city pursuant to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9201.

Any proposed ordinance may be submitted to the legislative body of the city by a petition filed with the elections official of the legislative body, in the manner hereinafter prescribed, after being signed by not less than the number of voters specified in this article. The petition may be in separate sections, providing that the petition complies with this article. The first page of each section shall contain the title of the petition and the text of the measure. The petition sections shall be designated in the manner set forth in Section 9020.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9202.

(a) Before circulating an initiative petition in any city, the proponents of the matter shall file with the elections official a notice of intention to do so, which shall be accompanied by the written text of the initiative and may be accompanied by a written statement not in excess of 500 words, setting forth the reasons for the proposed petition. The notice shall be signed by at least one, but not more than three, proponents and shall be in substantially the following form:
 
Notice of Intent to Circulate Petition

Notice is hereby given by the persons whose names appear hereon of their intention to circulate the petition within the City of ____ for the purpose of ____. A statement of the reasons of the proposed action as contemplated in the petition is as follows:

(b) Any person filing a notice of intent with the elections official shall pay a fee to be established by the legislative body not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) to be refunded to the filer if, within one year of the date of filing the notice of intent, the elections official certifies the sufficiency of the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9202.5.

From the time materials pertaining to an initiative petition are filed pursuant to Section 9202 until the day after the elections official determines that the initiative petition does not contain the minimum number of signatures required, the day after the election at which the initiative measure is put before the voters, or the day after the proposed ordinance is adopted by the legislative body of the city after being submitted to the legislative body of the city pursuant to Section 9201, as applicable, the elections official shall do both of the following:

(a) Keep on file at his or her office the notice of intention, written text of the initiative, and written statement setting forth the reasons for the proposed petition,
 if any, that the proponents of the initiative measure filed with the elections official pursuant to Section 9202.

(b) Furnish copies of the materials he or she is required to keep on file pursuant to subdivision (a) to any person upon request. The elections official may charge a fee to a person obtaining copies pursuant to this subdivision. The fee may not exceed the actual cost incurred by the elections official in providing the copies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 240, Sec. 2.   (AB 1851)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

9203.

(a) Any person who is interested in any proposed measure shall file a copy of the proposed measure with the elections official with a request that a ballot title and summary be prepared. This request shall be accompanied by the address of the person proposing the measure. The elections official shall immediately transmit a copy of the proposed measure to the city attorney. Within 15 days after the proposed measure is filed, the city attorney shall provide and return to the city elections official a ballot title for and summary of the proposed measure. The ballot title may differ from any other title of the proposed measure and shall express in 500 words or less the purpose of the proposed measure. In providing the ballot title, the city
 attorney shall give a true and impartial statement of the purpose of the proposed measure in such language that the ballot title shall neither be an argument, nor be likely to create prejudice, for or against the proposed measure.

(b) The elections official shall furnish a copy of the ballot title and summary to the person filing the proposed measure. The person proposing the measure shall, prior to its circulation, place upon each section of the petition, above the text of the proposed measure and across the top of each page of the petition on which signatures are to appear, in roman type not smaller than 11 point, the ballot title prepared by the city attorney. The text of the measure shall be printed in type not smaller than 8 point. The heading of the proposed measure shall be in a boldface type in substantially the following form:

INITIATIVE MEASURE TO BE DIRECTLY SUBMITTED TO THE VOTERS

The city attorney has prepared the following title and summary of the chief purpose and points of the proposed measure:

(Here set forth the title and summary prepared by the city attorney. This title and summary must also be printed across the top of each page of the petition whereon signatures are to appear.)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 887, Sec. 7.   (SB 1360)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

9204.

Any elector of the city may seek a writ of mandate requiring the ballot title or summary prepared by the city attorney to be amended. The court shall expedite hearing on the writ. A peremptory writ of mandate shall be issued only upon clear and convincing proof that the ballot title or summary is false, misleading, or inconsistent with the requirements of Section 9203.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 237, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9205.

A notice of intention and the title and summary of the proposed measure shall be published or posted or both as follows:

(a) If there is a newspaper of general circulation, as described in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, adjudicated as such, the notice, title, and summary shall be published therein at least once.

(b) If the petition is to be circulated in a city in which there is no adjudicated newspaper of general circulation, the notice, title, and summary shall be published at least once, in a newspaper circulated within the city and adjudicated as being of general circulation
 within the county in which the city is located and the notice, title, and summary shall be posted in three (3) public places within the city, which public places shall be those utilized for the purpose of posting ordinances as required in Section 36933 of the Government Code.

(c) If the petition is to be circulated in a city in which there is no adjudicated newspaper of general circulation, and there is no newspaper of general circulation adjudicated as such within the county, circulated within the city, then the notice, title, and summary shall be posted in the manner described in subdivision (b).

This section does not require the publication or posting of the text of the proposed measure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 248, Sec. 1.   (SB 327)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

9206.

Within 10 days after the date of publication or posting, or both, of the notice of intention and title and summary, the proponents shall file a copy of the notice and title and summary as published or posted together with an affidavit made by a representative of the newspaper in which the notice was published or, if the notice was posted, by a voter of the city, certifying to the fact of publication or posting.

If the notice and title and summary are both published and posted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 9205, the proponents shall file affidavits as required by this section made by a representative of the newspaper in which the notice was published certifying to the fact that the notice was published and by a voter of the city certifying to the fact that the notice was posted.

These affidavits, together with a copy of the notice of intention and title and summary, shall be filed with the elections official of the legislative body of the city in his or her office during normal office hours as posted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9207.

The proponents may commence to circulate the petitions among the voters of the city for signatures by any registered voter of the city after publication or posting, or both, as required by Section 9205, of the title and summary prepared by the city attorney. Each section of the petition shall bear a copy of the notice of intention and the title and summary prepared by the city attorney.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9208.

Signatures upon petitions and sections of petitions shall be secured, and the petition, together with all sections of the petition, shall be filed within 180 days from the date of receipt of the title and summary, or after termination of any action for a writ of mandate pursuant to Section 9204, and, if applicable, after receipt of an amended title or summary or both, whichever occurs later. Petitions and sections thereof shall be filed in the office of the elections official during normal office hours as posted. If the petitions are not filed within the time permitted by this section, the petitions shall be void for all purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9209.

Each section shall have attached thereto the declaration of the person soliciting the signatures. This declaration shall be substantially in the same form as set forth in Section 9022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 20.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

9210.

The petition shall be filed by the proponents or by a person or persons authorized in writing by the proponents. All sections of the petition shall be filed at one time. Once filed, a petition section shall not be amended except by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

When the petition is presented for filing, the elections official shall do all of the following:

(a) Ascertain the number of registered voters of the city last reported by the county elections official to the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 2187 effective at the time the notice specified in Section 9202 was published.

(b) Determine the total number of signatures affixed to the petition. If, from this examination, the elections official determines that the number of signatures, prima facie, equals or is in excess of the minimum number of signatures required, he or she shall accept the petition for filing. The petition shall be deemed as filed on that date.
 If, from this examination, the elections official determines that the number of signatures, prima facie, does not equal or exceed the minimum number of signatures required, the official shall not take further action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 58, Sec. 10.   (AB 3259)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9211.

After the petition has been filed, as herein provided, the elections official shall examine the petition in the same manner as are county petitions in accordance with Sections 9114 and 9115, except that for the purposes of this section, references to the board of supervisors shall be treated as references to the legislative body of the city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9212.

(a) During the circulation of the petition, or before taking either action described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 9215, the legislative body may refer the proposed initiative measure to a city agency or agencies for a report on any or all of the following:

(1) Its fiscal impact.

(2) Its effect on the internal consistency of the city’s general and specific plans, including the housing element, the consistency between planning and zoning, and the limitations on city actions under Section 65008 of the Government Code and Chapters 4.2 (commencing with Section 65913) and 4.3
 (commencing with Section 65915) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(3) Its effect on the use of land, the impact on the availability and location of housing, and the ability of the city to meet its regional housing needs.

(4) Its impact on funding for infrastructure of all types, including, but not limited to, transportation, schools, parks, and open space. The report may also discuss whether the measure would be likely to result in increased infrastructure costs or savings, including the costs of infrastructure maintenance, to current residents and businesses.

(5) Its impact on the community’s ability to attract and retain business and employment.

(6) Its impact on the uses of vacant parcels of land.

(7) Its impact on agricultural lands, open space, traffic congestion, existing business districts, and developed areas designated for revitalization.

(8) Any other matters the legislative body requests to be in the report.

(b) The report shall be presented to the legislative body within the time prescribed by the legislative body, but no later than 30 days after the elections official certifies to the legislative body the sufficiency of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 748, Sec. 5.   (AB 765)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

9213.

On or before April 1 of each odd-numbered year, the elections official of each legislative body shall file a report with the Secretary of State containing the following information:

(a) The number of municipal initiative petitions circulated during the preceding two calendar years which did not qualify for the ballot, and the number of these proposed initiatives for which reports were prepared pursuant to Section 9212.

(b) With respect to municipal initiative measures that qualified for the ballot in the preceding two calendar years, the number that were approved by the voters, and the number of these ballot measures for which reports were prepared pursuant to Section 9212.

(c) With respect to municipal initiative measures that qualified for the ballot in the preceding two calendar years, the number that were not approved by the voters, and the number of these ballot measures for which reports were prepared pursuant to Section 9212.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9215.

If the initiative petition is signed by not less than 10 percent of the voters of the city, according to the last report of registration by the county elections official to the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 2187, effective at the time the notice specified in Section 9202 was published, or, in a city with 1,000 or less registered voters, by 25 percent of the voters or 100 voters of the city, whichever is the lesser number, the legislative body shall do one of the following:

(a) Adopt the ordinance, without alteration, at the regular meeting at which the certification of the petition is presented, or within 10 days after it is presented.

(b) Submit the ordinance, without alteration, to the voters pursuant to
 Section 1405.

(c) Order a report pursuant to Section 9212 at the regular meeting at which the certification of the petition is presented. When the report is presented to the legislative body, the legislative body shall either adopt the ordinance within 10 days or order an election pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 748, Sec. 7.   (AB 765)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

9215.5.

The proponent of an initiative may withdraw the initiative at any time before the 88th day before the election, whether or not the petition has already been found sufficient by the elections official.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 155, Sec. 2.   (SB 1153)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9216.

In cities having a mayor, or like officer, with the veto power, when the passage of an ordinance petitioned for by the voters is vetoed, the failure of the legislative body to pass the ordinance over the veto shall be deemed a refusal of the legislative body to pass the ordinance within the meaning of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9217.

If a majority of the voters voting on a proposed ordinance vote in its favor, the ordinance shall become a valid and binding ordinance of the city. The ordinance shall be considered as adopted upon the date that the vote is declared by the legislative body, and shall go into effect 10 days after that date. No ordinance that is either proposed by initiative petition and adopted by the vote of the legislative body of the city without submission to the voters, or adopted by the voters, shall be repealed or amended except by a vote of the people, unless provision is otherwise made in the original ordinance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9218.

Any number of proposed ordinances may be voted upon at the same election, but the same subject matter shall not be voted upon twice within any 12-month period at a special election under the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9221.

If the provisions of two or more ordinances adopted at the same election conflict, the ordinance receiving the highest number of affirmative votes shall control.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9222.

The legislative body of the city may submit to the voters, without a petition therefor, a proposition for the repeal, amendment, or enactment of any ordinance, to be voted upon at any succeeding regular or special city election, and if the proposition submitted receives a majority of the votes cast on it at the election, the ordinance shall be repealed, amended, or enacted accordingly. A proposition may be submitted, or a special election may be called for the purpose of voting on a proposition, by ordinance or resolution. The election shall be held not less than 88 days after the date of the order of election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 371, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9223.

Whenever any ordinance or measure is required by this article to be submitted to the voters of a city at any election, the elections official of the legislative body shall cause the ordinance or measure to be printed. A copy of the ordinance or measure shall be made available to any voter upon request.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9224.

The enacting clause of an ordinance submitted to the voters of a city shall be substantially in the following form:

“The people of the City of ________ do ordain as follows:”.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9226.

This article does not apply to any statewide initiative measure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Referendum [9235. - 9247.]

9235.

No ordinance shall become effective until 30 days from and after the date of its final passage, except:

(a) An ordinance calling or otherwise relating to an election.

(b) An ordinance for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety that contains a declaration of, and the facts constituting, its urgency and is passed by a four-fifths vote of the city council.

(c) Ordinances relating to street improvement proceedings.

(d) Other ordinances governed by particular provisions of state law prescribing the manner of their passage and adoption.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9236.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 9235, ordinances authorizing the issuance of revenue bonds by a city as part of a joint powers entity pursuant to Section 6547 of the Government Code shall not take effect for 60 days.

(b) When the number of votes cast for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election within the boundaries of the city described in subdivision (a) exceeds 500,000, the ordinance is subject to referendum upon presentation of a petition bearing signatures
 of at least 5 percent of the entire vote cast within the boundaries of the city for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election. When the number of votes cast for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election within the boundaries of the city is less than 500,000, the ordinance is subject to referendum upon presentation of a petition bearing signatures of at least 10 percent of the entire vote cast within the boundaries of the city for all candidates for Governor at the last gubernatorial election.

(c) For the purpose of submitting the question to the voters pursuant to subdivision (b), the ballot wording shall approximate the following:

“Shall the (county name) ,as a member of the (joint powers entity name) ,
 authorize the issuance of revenue bonds by the joint powers entity in the amount of $____ pursuant to ordinance number ____, dated ____, the bonds to be used for the following purposes and to be redeemed in the following manner: ________?”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9237.

If a petition protesting the adoption of an ordinance, and circulated by a person who meets the requirements of Section 102, is submitted to the elections official of the legislative body of the city in his or her office during normal office hours, as posted, within 30 days of the date the adopted ordinance is attested by the city clerk or secretary to the legislative body, and is signed by not less than 10 percent of the voters of the city according to the county elections official’s last official report of registration to the Secretary of State, or, in a city with 1,000 or less registered voters, is signed by not less than 25 percent of the voters or 100 voters of the city, whichever is the lesser, the effective date of the
 ordinance shall be suspended and the legislative body shall reconsider the ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 21.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

9237.2.

The proponent of a referendum may withdraw the referendum at any time before the 88th day before the election, whether or not the petition has already been found sufficient by the elections official.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 569, Sec. 2.   (SB 681)   Effective October 8, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9237.5.

The provisions of this code relating to the form of petitions, the duties of the county elections official, and the manner of holding elections shall govern the petition procedure and submission of the ordinance to the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 312, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

9238.

(a) Across the top of each page of the referendum petition there shall be printed the following:“Referendum Against an Ordinance Passed by the City Council”(b) Each section of the referendum petition shall contain all of the following:

(1) The identifying number or title of the ordinance.

(2) Either of the following:

(A) The text of the ordinance or the portion of the ordinance that is the subject of the referendum.

(B) An impartial summary of the referendum not to exceed 5,000 words prepared pursuant to the following procedure:

(i) Within three business days of the final passage of the ordinance, the referendum’s proponents shall file a copy of the proposed summary with the local elections official, who shall immediately transmit a copy of the proposed summary to the city attorney.

(ii) Within 10 business
 days the city attorney shall issue an approved summary to the local elections official and the referendum’s proponents for circulation. The city attorney may edit the summary prior to approval. All edits made to the summary shall be true and impartial and shall not contain argument or any matter likely to cause prejudice for or against the referendum. The city attorney may add the full text of the ordinance, or the portion of the ordinance that is the subject of the referendum, to the summary if doing so would not exceed the 5,000-word limit.

(iii) The summary shall include a link to a public website containing the text of the ordinance or the portion of the ordinance that is the subject of the referendum.

(iv) The 5,000 word limit imposed by this subparagraph shall include all attachments, exhibits, and other supplements to the summary.

(v) If the city attorney fails to issue an approved summary within 10 business days, the proposed summary submitted by the proponents shall be considered approved.

(vi) Notwithstanding Section 9235, proponents who circulate a referendum petition pursuant to this subparagraph shall have 30 days from the date the summary is approved to submit a petition with the required number of signatures to the local elections official. The ordinance subject to the referendum petition shall not become effective until this period has expired.

(C) After the proponents begin circulating a referendum petition prepared pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), the proponents shall not circulate another version of the referendum petition prepared using the other method.

(c) The petition sections shall be designed in the same form as specified in Section 9020.

(d) Each section of the referendum petition shall have attached thereto the declaration of the person soliciting the signatures. This declaration shall be substantially in the same form as set forth in Section 9022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 567, Sec. 1.   (SB 359)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9239.

Petitions shall be accepted for filing by the elections official and the determination of the number of signatures thereon shall be made by the elections official in accordance with Section 9210. Petitions shall be filed with the elections official of the legislative body of the city in his or her office during normal office hours, as posted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9240.

After the petition has been filed as herein provided, the elections official shall examine the petition and certify the results in the same manner as are county petitions in Sections 9114 and 9115 except that, for the purposes of this section, references to the board of supervisors shall be treated as references to the legislative body of the city.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9241.

If the legislative body does not entirely repeal the ordinance against which the petition is filed, the legislative body shall submit the ordinance to the voters, either at the next regular municipal election occurring not less than 88 days after the order of the legislative body, or at a special election called for the purpose, not less than 88 days after the order of the legislative body. The ordinance shall not become effective until a majority of the voters voting on the ordinance vote in favor of it. If the legislative body repeals the ordinance or submits the
 ordinance to the voters, and a majority of the voters voting on the ordinance do not vote in favor of it, the ordinance shall not again be enacted by the legislative body for a period of one year after the date of its repeal by the legislative body or disapproval by the voters.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9242.

Signatures upon petitions, and sections thereof, shall be secured, and the petition, together with all sections thereof, shall be filed, within 30 days from the date of the adoption of the ordinance to which it relates. Petitions and sections thereof shall be filed with the elections official of the legislative body of the city in his or her office during normal office hours as posted. Petitions which are not filed within the time permitted by this section shall be void for all purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9243.

Elections pursuant to this article shall be held in accordance with Sections 9217 to 9225, inclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9244.

Whenever the legislative body of a city has voted in favor of the repeal of an ordinance protested against by the voters, as provided in this article, and the mayor, or like officer, has vetoed the repeal, the failure of the legislative body to pass the repeal over the veto shall be deemed a refusal to repeal the ordinance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9245.

If approval of an ordinance by the mayor or like officer is necessary, the date of approval shall be deemed the date of its final passage by the legislative body within the meaning of this article.

If an ordinance becomes law when the time for approval or veto has expired, and no action has been taken, the date of the expiration of that time shall be deemed the date of its final passage by the legislative body within the meaning of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9246.

Any duty imposed in this chapter upon the legislative body of a city with regard to calling a municipal election, or in connection with an election called pursuant to this chapter, is likewise imposed upon any officer having any duty to perform connected with the election, so far as may be necessary to carry out this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9247.

Article 1 (commencing with Section 9200) and this article do not apply to cities having a charter adopted under Section 3 of Article XI of the California Constitution, and having in their charters any provision for the direct initiation of ordinances by the voters; nor to proceedings had for the improvement of streets in or rights-of-way owned by cities, the opening or closing of streets, the changing of grades or the doing of other work, the cost of which, or any portion of the cost which is to be borne by special assessments upon real property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. City or City and County Charters [9255. - 9269.]

9255.

(a) A charter or charter amendment proposed by a charter commission, whether elected or appointed by a governing body, for a city or city and county shall be submitted to the voters at an established statewide general election pursuant to Section 1200, provided there are at least 95 days before the election. A charter commission may also submit a charter pursuant to Section 34455 of the Government Code.

(b) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1415, the following city or city and county charter
 proposals shall be submitted to the voters at an established statewide general election pursuant to Section 1200, provided there are at least 88 days before the election:

(1) A proposal to adopt a charter, or an amendment or repeal of a charter, proposed by the governing body of a city or a city and county on its own motion.
